Rhode Island, session 2025, SB461.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 27-20.8 of the General Laws entitled "Prescription Drug Benefits" is
hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
27-20.8-5. Co-pay cap for prescription asthma inhalers, devices, and equipment.
(a) As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires, "prescription inhaler”
means a prescribed inhaled medication approved by the FDA for the treatment or prevention of a
respiratory condition, and includes, but is not limited to, pressurized metered dose inhalers (pMDI),
dry powdered inhalers (DPI), and soft mist inhalers (SMI). "Prescription inhaler" does not include
inhaled medications available over-the-counter without a prescription.
(b) As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires, "prescription devices”
and “prescription equipment” means prescribed supplies used to administer inhaled medications,
such as nebulizers and holding chambers.
(c) A health plan that provides coverage for prescription inhalers and prescription devices
or prescription equipment used to administer prescribed inhaled medications, pursuant to the terms
of a health coverage plan the health plan offers, shall cap the total amount that a covered person is
required to pay for a covered prescription inhaler, prescription device or prescription equipment
used to administer such medications, at an amount not to exceed twenty-five dollars ($25.00), per
thirty (30) day supply. Coverage for prescription inhalers, prescription devices or prescription
equipment used to administer such medications, shall not be subject to any deductible.
(d) Nothing in this section prevents a health plan from reducing a covered person's cost

sharing to an amount less than the amount specified in subsection (c) of this section.
(e) Prior authorization policies may only be used to confirm the presence of diagnoses or
other medical conditions which demonstrates that an item or service is medically necessary.
(f) The office of the health insurance commissioner may use any of its enforcement powers
to obtain a health plan's compliance with this section.
(g) The office of the health insurance commissioner may promulgate rules and regulations
as necessary to implement and administer this section and to align with federal requirements.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect on January 1, 2026.
========
LC001373
========
LC001373 - Page 2 of 3